Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.430

Criminal justice training commission firing range maintenance account.

The criminal justice training commission firing range maintenance account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys generated by the rental of the commission's firing range facilities, property, and equipment must be deposited into the account. The sources of the moneys generated and deposited under this section may include federal, state, local, or private grants, consistent with RCW 43.101.190. Expenditures from the account may be used only for cost related to rental, maintenance, or development of the commission's firing range facilities, property, and equipment. Only the executive director, acting on behalf of the criminal justice training commission, or the executive director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2013 c 265 s 1.]